Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-102
Act; applicability; how construed.

The Election Act shall apply to all elections held in the state unless otherwise specifically provided. The act shall be liberally construed so that the will of the registered voters is not defeated by an informality or a failure to comply with the act with respect to the giving of any notice or the conducting of any election or the certifying of the results of the election.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 2.